Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Executive Division ....................  $ 3,748,644
(2) Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division................ $ 5,599,837
(3) Appellate Division ..................... $ 24,491,812
(4) Adult Trial Division .................. $255,217,575
(5) Juvenile Trial Division.............. $ 49,122,335
(6) Preauthorized Expenses............ $ 54,837,645
(7) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 51,554,603
(8) Parent Child Representation
Program .................................... $ 47,475,727
(9) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 16,141,278
(10) Special Programs, Contracts
and Distributions Division ........ $ 6,528,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Public Defense Services
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Juvenile Trial Division.............. $ 4,352,000
(2) Preauthorized Expenses............ $ 1
(3) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 4,449,667
(4) Parent Child Representation
Program .................................... $ 11,968,000
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, to be allocated to the Public  Defense Services Commission
Enrolled Senate Bill 5532 (SB 5532-A) Page 1
for Adult Trial Division  or Juvenile Trial Division caseload costs the commission is unable
to mitigate during the interim legislative periods.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (5), chapter 444, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for Nonroutine Expenses, is decreased by
$413,560.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 444, Oregon Laws
2021, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, for Court Mandated Expenses, is decreased by
$3,396,146.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5532 (SB 5532-A) Page 2